Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 2. State Library Distribution and Data Access Center.

Sec. 14.56.090.
State library distribution and data access center established.

There is established in the state library the state library distribution and data access center.

History.

(§ 1 ch 2 SLA 1970; am § 2 ch 27 SLA 1979)

Sec. 14.56.100.
Duties of center.

The center shall, in cooperation with federal, municipal, and private data collection and research efforts, promote the establishment of an orderly depository library and data index distribution and access system.

History.

(§ 1 ch 2 SLA 1970; am § 3 ch 27 SLA 1979)

Sec. 14.56.110.
Regulations.

The Department of Education and Early Development shall adopt regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of AS

14.56.090

—

14.56.180

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 2 SLA 1970)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 14.56.120.
Deposit of publications and research data.

Each state agency shall deposit, upon release, at least four copies of each of its state publications in the center. Additional copies of each publication may be requested by the center for deposit in quantities necessary to meet the needs of the depository library system and to provide inter-library service to those libraries not having depository status.

Each state agency shall notify the center of the creation of all data published or compiled by or for it at public expense, including automated data bases, and provide for its accessibility through the center unless the data is protected by the constitutional right to privacy or is of a type stated by law to be confidential or the agency is otherwise prohibited by law from doing so.

The center is also a depository for publications of municipalities and regional educational attendance areas, including surveys and studies produced by a municipality or regional educational attendance area or produced for it on contract. Four copies of each publication produced for a municipality or regional educational attendance area may be deposited with the center for record and distribution purposes.

Each municipality or regional educational attendance area may notify the center of the creation of all data published or compiled by or for it at public expense and provide for its accessibility through the center, unless the data is protected by the constitutional right to privacy or is of a type stated by law to be confidential or the municipality or regional educational attendance area is otherwise prohibited by law from doing so.

When a research project or study is conducted for a person by a state agency, a municipality, or a regional educational attendance area, even though no state funding is involved, the state agency, municipality, or regional educational attendance area shall request that person for permission to make copies of its final report available to the center under AS

14.56.090

—

14.56.180

. If permission is granted, the report shall be deposited with the center.

History.

(§ 1 ch 2 SLA 1970; am § 4 ch 27 SLA 1979; am § 9 ch 200 SLA 1990)

Sec. 14.56.123.
Liaison with center.

Each state agency shall and each municipality and regional educational attendance area may designate one of its employees to be responsible for depositing the materials and information specified in AS

14.56.120

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 27 SLA 1979)

Sec. 14.56.125.
Summaries and indices.

Upon notification of the creation of data under AS

14.56.120

, a state agency shall and a municipality or regional educational attendance area may prepare an abstract or summary of it.

The center shall prepare and keep current an index of all publications and data abstracts or summaries on file and shall publish and distribute that index regularly to contracting depository libraries and to other Alaska libraries upon request.

History.

(§ 5 ch 27 SLA 1979)

Sec. 14.56.130.
Other documents required of state agencies.

Upon the request of the center, a state agency shall furnish the center with a complete list of its current state publications, data published or compiled by or for it at public expense, and a copy of its mailing or exchange lists. However, data that is protected by the constitutional right to privacy or is of a type stated by law to be confidential or that the agency is otherwise prohibited by law from distributing may not be furnished to the center.

History.

(§ 1 ch 2 SLA 1970; am § 6 ch 27 SLA 1979)

Sec. 14.56.135.
Efficiency and computerization.

The center shall, to the extent practicable, avoid duplication, coordinate its activities with other state agencies charged with record-keeping functions, and employ computerization to compile or organize research data and other materials.

History.

(§ 7 ch 27 SLA 1979)

Sec. 14.56.140.
List of publications. [Repealed, § 11 ch 27 SLA 1979.]

Sec. 14.56.150.
Depository library contracts.

The center may enter into depository contracts with municipal, regional educational attendance area, university or community college libraries, public library associations, state library agencies, the Library of Congress, and other state and federal library systems.
The requirements for eligibility to contract as a depository library shall be established by the Department of Education and Early Development upon the recommendation of the state librarian and shall include and take into consideration the type of library, its ability to preserve publications or data and to make them available for public use, and the geographical location of the library for ease of access to residents in all areas of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 2 SLA 1970; am § 8 ch 27 SLA 1979)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 14.56.160.
Depository library designations.

Libraries may be designated as either “complete depository” or “selective depository.”
A complete depository library shall be sent one copy of every state publication.
A selective depository library shall be sent one copy of every publication from the specific state agencies it designates.

History.

(§ 1 ch 2 SLA 1970)

Sec. 14.56.170.
Distribution of state publications and research data.

The center may not engage in general public distribution of either (1) state publications or lists of publications or (2) the index of publications and research data. However, unless expressly prohibited by law, the center shall make available to any person, upon request and under procedures established by it, publications, summaries, research data, indices, and other materials in its possession.
Reasonable fees for reproduction or printing costs and for mailing and distribution of materials may be charged by the center.

History.

(§ 1 ch 2 SLA 1970; am § 9 ch 27 SLA 1979)

Sec. 14.56.180.
Definitions.

In AS

14.56.090

—

14.56.180

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“center” means the state library distribution and data access center;

“research data” or “data” means a representation of facts, concepts or instructions in a formalized manner suitable for communication, interpretation, or processing by humans or by automatic means that was prepared to serve as a basis for reasoning, calculation, discussion, or decision and that is determined appropriate for indexing by the state librarian;

“state agency” includes state departments, divisions, agencies, boards, associations, commissions, corporations, and offices, and the University of Alaska and its affiliated research institutes;

“state publication” includes any official document, compilation, journal, bill, law, resolution, bluebook, statute, code, register, pamphlet, list, book, report, study, hearing transcript, leaflet, order, regulation, directory, periodical, or magazine issued or contracted for by a state agency determined by the state librarian to be appropriate for retention in the center.

History.

(§ 1 ch 2 SLA 1970; am § 10 ch 27 SLA 1979; am § 88 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1987 to alphabetize the defined terms.

Secs. 14.56.182 — 14.56.190.
Alaska Blue Book. [Repealed, § 19 ch 6 SLA 1998.]

Secs. 14.56.200 — 14.56.240.
Rural community libraries. [Repealed, § 6 ch 124 SLA 1998.]

Secs. 14.56.250 — 14.56.290.
[Renumbered as AS 14.56.182 — 14.56.190.]